Tennessee, session 114, HB0356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
HB0356
001989
- 1 -

SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Each LEA and public charter school shall recognize November 7 of each
year as "Victims of Communism Day" to honor the people who have fallen victim to
communist regimes across the world.
(b) Each LEA and public charter school that provides a world history and
geography course to high school students enrolled in the LEA or public charter school
shall provide the students enrolled in the course with at least forty-five (45) minutes of
instruction on Victims of Communism Day that includes topics such as Mao Zedong and
the Cultural Revolution, Joseph Stalin and the Soviet System, Fidel Castro and the
Cuban Revolution, Pol Pot and the Khmer Rouge, and Nicolás Maduro and the
Chavismo movement, and how victims suffered under these regimes through poverty,
starvation, migration, systemized lethal violence, and suppression of speech. If Victims
of Communism Day is on a day in which a high school student enrolled in a world history
and geography course does not receive instruction for the course, then the student must
receive the instruction required pursuant to this section on the immediately following day
that the student receives instruction for the course.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001989